Utah statutes.
31A-30-111.   Limitations on high risk enrollees.
(1) (a)  The requirements of this chapter do not apply to any carrier that is
currently in a state of supervision, insolvency, or liquidation.
(b)  If a carrier demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that
the requirements of this chapter would place the carrier in a state of
supervision, insolvency, or liquidation the commissioner may waive or modify
the requirements of Sections 31A-30-108  and 31A-30-110.
(2) (a)  A modification or waiver by the commissioner under Subsection (1)(b)
shall be effective for a period of not more than one year.
(b)  At the end of the period described in Subsection (2)(a), a carrier is
subject to Sections 31A-30-108 and 31A-30-110 unless the carrier demonstrates
to the satisfaction of the commissioner the need for a modification or waiver
in accordance with Subsection (1)(b).
(3)  Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter, a carrier may deny
health benefit plan coverage in the small employer and individual market if
the carrier demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the
carrier:
(a)  does not have the financial reserves necessary to underwrite additional
coverage;
(b)  is applying this section uniformly to all small employers and individuals
without regard to:
(i)  any health status-related factor of the individuals; or
(ii)  whether the individuals are eligible individuals.
